Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1218
Use of explosives without a permit; penalty.

(1) Any person who uses any explosive materials for any purpose whatsoever, unless such person has obtained a permit from the Nebraska State Patrol to use such explosive materials or uses such explosive materials under the supervision of a permitholder, commits the offense of use of explosives without a permit.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, use of explosives without a permit is a Class I misdemeanor.

(3) Upon a showing that the accused was eligible under existing rules and regulations to receive a permit or had a valid educational, industrial, commercial, agricultural, or other legitimate need for a permit, use of explosives without a permit is a Class II misdemeanor.

(4) Any person under the direct and proximate supervision of a person possessing a permit to use explosive materials may also use explosive materials under such safety provisions as the Nebraska State Patrol may adopt and promulgate. Federal licensees and permittees shall obtain permits from the Nebraska State Patrol to use explosive materials.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 250;

Laws 1989, LB 215, § 5.